Wisconsin, session 2025, AB638.
do enact as follows:AB638,11Section 1. 440.52 (10) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:AB638,2,52440.52 (10) (bm) Reserve account. 1. The department may not approve a 3school under this subsection, whether upon initial application or renewal, unless 4the school maintains a reserve account to provide indemnification to any student 5who suffers loss or damage as a result of any of the following:AB638,2,76a. Fraud or any false representation by the school or a person acting on behalf 7of the school.AB638,2,98b. The school’s failure to perform its contractual obligations to the student, 9including the school’s closure.AB638,2,14102. The balance of the reserve account under this paragraph may not be less 11than 25 percent of the amount of the school’s highest annual revenue in the 12preceding 5-year period, except that, with respect to an application for an initial 13approval, the reserve account shall be established at 25 percent of the school’s 14projected revenue in its first year of operation.AB638,215Section 2. 440.52 (10) (c) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:AB638,2,1716440.52 (10) (c) 4. Specify Include a student protection fee at a rate of $3 per 17$1,000 of adjusted gross annual school revenue as reported to the department.AB638,31Section 3. 440.52 (10) (cm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB638,3,52440.52 (10) (cm) Limit on student protection fee. The department shall 3discontinue collecting annual student protection fees under par. (c) 4. during the 4period that the balance in the fund created by those fees exceeds $1,000,000 5$5,000,000.AB638,46Section 4. Initial applicability.AB638,3,87(1) This act first applies to initial and renewal applications for school approval 8received on the effective date of this subsection.AB638,59Section 5. Effective date.AB638,3,1110(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after 11publication.AB638,3,1212